Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-977.02
Retirement system contributions, income, property, and rights; how treated.

All contributions to the retirement system, all property and rights purchased with the contributions, and all investment income attributable to the contributions, property, or rights shall be held in trust by the State of Nebraska for the exclusive benefit of members and their beneficiaries and shall only be used to pay benefits to such persons and to pay administrative expenses according to the provisions of the School Employees Retirement Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 59.